


Page not found «  Sucampo
             


 AboutMission, Vision & ValuesHistoryCommunityManagementBoardLocationsScience & InnovationPipelineRegister as an Investigative SiteProductUnited StatesAsiaEuropeMenu ItemInvestorsPartneringOur PartnersPartnership OpportunitiesNewsCareersCareer Opportunities
 ABOUTaboutAboutMission, Vision & ValuesHistoryCommunityManagement OldBoardLocationsScience & Innovationscience & innovationScience & InnovationPipelineRegister as an Investigative SiteProductproductProductEuropeAsiaUnited StatesInvestorsinvestorsInvestorsFinancials & SEC FilingsAnalyst CoverageStock InformationEvents & PresentationsCorporate GovernanceOnline Investor CenterPartneringpartneringPartneringOur PartnersPartnership OpportunitiesNewsCareerscareersCareersCareer Opportunities11th December 2014Sucampo Appoints John H. Johnson to Board of DirectorsFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 11:23 amBethesda, Md., December 15, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced the appointment of John H. Johnson, founder, Plum Brook Advisors, to its board of directors (Board). “We are pleased to welcome John to our Board during Sucampo’s continued evolution,” said Peter Greenleaf, chief executive officer of Sucampo. “As a recognized leader in the biopharmaceutical industry who has tremendous experience in building and growing science-focused companies, John will be instrumental as we continue to execute on our strategic objectives, accelerate the development of our pipeline, and diversify our science.” Mr. Johnson brings more than 30 years of leadership experience in the pharmaceutical and biotechnology industry to Sucampo. He has held executive management roles at leading global corporations, including Johnson & Johnson, Eli Lilly & Company, ImClone and Pfizer, Inc. He recently served as a member of the board of directors of Pharmaceutical Research and Manufacturers of America (PhRMA) and as a member of the Health Section Governing Board of Biotechnology Industry Organization (BIO). He also served as chairman, president and chief executive officer of Dendreon Corporation and as chief executive officer and Board member of Savient Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Prior to these roles, Mr. Johnson served as president of Eli Lilly & Company’s Oncology Unit following its 2008 acquisition of Imclone Systems, Inc., where he served as chief executive officer and Board member. Before joining Imclone, he held various executive roles of increasing responsibility, including Company Group Chairman of Biopharmaceuticals at Johnson & Johnson, where he was responsible for the Johnson & Johnson Biotechnology, Immunology and Oncology commercial businesses. Earlier in his career, Mr. Johnson held multiple executive positions at Parkstone Medical Information Systems, Inc., Ortho-McNeil Pharmaceutical Corp. and Pfizer, Inc. Mr. Johnson served as the chairman of Tranzyme Pharma, Inc. and as a member of the board of BioNJ. Mr. Johnson currently serves as a member of the board of directors of Cempra Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Histogenics and Portola Pharmaceuticals. “I am excited about the opportunity to join Sucampo’s board of directors and leadership team,” said John H. Johnson. “I look forward to contributing to Sucampo’s future growth and success developing and diversifying its pipeline and its delivery to patients in need and healthcare providers around the world.” About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of drug candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals). Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected.   compare hotels Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Forms 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact: Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com
Comments (0)25th November 2014Sucampo Pharmaceuticals Announces Webcast of Its Presentation at the 26th Annual Piper Jaffray Healthcare ConferenceFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 11:22 amBETHESDA, Md., November 25, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (Nasdaq:SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that it will webcast its corporate presentation at the 26th Annual Piper Jaffray Healthcare Conference taking place Tuesday, December 2, 2014 at 10:50 A.M. ET.The presentation will be webcast live and may be accessed from the Event Calendar page of Sucampo’s website at investor.sucampo.com . Presentation slides will be available via the webcast links. A replay of the webcast will also be available on the Company’s website for several days after the live event. To ensure a timely connection, it is recommended that users register at least 15 minutes prior to the scheduled webcast. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of drug candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals).Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected.   satellite pictures Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate CommunicationsSucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com
Comments (0)12th November 2014Sucampo Files Patent Infringement Lawsuit Against Dr. Reddy’sFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 11:21 amBETHESDA, Md., November 12, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that Sucampo, R-Tech Ueno, Ltd., Takeda Pharmaceutical Company Limited (Takeda), and certain affiliates of Takeda have filed a patent infringement lawsuit in the United States District Court for the District of New Jersey against Dr. Reddy’s Laboratories, Ltd. and Dr. Reddy’s Laboratories, Inc. (collectively, Dr. Reddy’s) related to an Abbreviated New Drug Application (ANDA) that Dr. Reddy’s filed with the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to market, sell and use a generic version of the 8 mcg and 24 mcg AMITIZA® (lubiprostone) soft gelatin capsule products. The lawsuit claims infringement of 7 patents that are listed in the FDA’s Orange Book, with the latest expiring in 2027. Sucampo commenced the lawsuit within 45 days from the receipt of a Notice letter sent by Dr. Reddy’s, dated October 1, 2014, regarding its filing of its ANDA. Under the Hatch-Waxman Act, as a result of the patent infringement lawsuit, final FDA approval of Dr. Reddy’s ANDA will be stayed up to 30 months from the date of receipt of the Notice letter. “Protecting AMITIZA’s intellectual property is of paramount importance to Sucampo,” said Peter Greenleaf, Chief Executive Officer of Sucampo. “We believe that the AMITIZA patents, granted by the U.S. Patent & Trademark Office, are valid, enforceable, and infringed by Dr. Reddy’s proposed lubiprostone products, and we will vigorously defend them.” About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of drug candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals).Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate CommunicationsSucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com  
Comments (0)11th November 2014Sucampo Pharmaceuticals Announces Webcast of Its Presentation at the Stifel 2014 Healthcare ConferenceFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 11:17 amBETHESDA, Md., November 11, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (Nasdaq:SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that it will webcast its corporate presentation at the Stifel 2014 Healthcare Conference taking place Tuesday, November 18, 2014 at 4:45 PM ET.The presentation will be webcast live and may be accessed from the Event Calendar page of Sucampo’s website at http://investor.sucampo.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=201197&p=irol-calendar. Presentation slides will be available via the webcast links. A replay of the webcast will also be available on the Company’s website for several days after the live event. To ensure a timely connection, it is recommended that users register at least 15 minutes prior to the scheduled webcast. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of drug candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals).Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate CommunicationsSucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com
Comments (0)6th November 2014Sucampo Announces Third Quarter 2014 Financial ResultsFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 11:10 amStrong Revenue and Sales Growth for AMITIZA® Raises 2014 Earnings Guidance, Excluding Special Items CEO Peter Greenleaf to Provide Update on Significant Progress Against Strategic Plan Sucampo to host conference call today at 8:30 am Eastern BETHESDA, Md., November 6, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP) today reported consolidated financial results for the third quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2014. Sucampo reported year over year growth of 49% to $31.5 million in total revenue, 24% to $16.8 million in product royalty revenue and 118% to $11.7 million in product sales. Sucampo also reported net income of $1.5 million and fully-diluted earnings per share (EPS) of $0.03 during the third quarter of 2014. Sucampo raised its full year 2014 earnings guidance to $15.0 million to $20.0 million net income, excluding special items, versus previous guidance of $4.0 million to $6.0 million. During the third quarter of 2014, Sucampo recorded a non-cash impairment to its intangible assets of $5.6 million to reflect a reduction in the expected future cash flows received from the sales of RESCULA for the approved indication, which Sucampo has ceased marketing, and no further orders have been made. Details of the impairment charge are discussed in the Cost of Goods and R&D expenses sections below. __________________________Sucampo is providing certain 2014 non-GAAP information that excludes certain items because of the nature of these items and the impact they have on the analysis of underlying business performance and trends. Management believes that providing this information enhances investors’ understanding of Sucampo’s performance. This information should be considered in addition to, but not in lieu of, information prepared in accordance with GAAP.Net income is attributable to Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. on a consolidated basis. “In the third quarter, Sucampo’s strong financial performance continued, and I am pleased that we made significant progress against our strategy,” said Peter Greenleaf, Chief Executive Officer of Sucampo. “Our total revenue grew 49% driven by AMITIZA’s continued growth in the US and Japan. The prospects for additional growth of the product are greater than ever given the agreements we signed this quarter: creating a global partnership with Takeda, expanding the current AMITIZA agreement with Takeda for North America, and settling our generic litigation. This is a time of great opportunity for Sucampo, as we continue to execute on our strategy with a focus on the development of our pipeline and the diversification of our science.” 
 Third Quarter 2014 Operational Review AMITIZAUnited States (U.S.) AMITIZA® (lubiprostone) total prescriptions were 342,020, an increase of 4.2%, compared to the third quarter of 2013. Net sales of AMITIZA, reported by Takeda Pharmaceuticals U.S.A., Inc. (Takeda) for royalty calculation purposes, increased 22% to $88.5 million for the third quarter of 2014, compared to $72.5 million in the same period of 2013. Net sales of AMITIZA, reported by Takeda for royalty calculation purposes, increased 18% to $240.5 million for the first nine months of 2014, compared to $204.1 million in the same period of 2013. Launched a pilot direct-to-consumer (DTC) advertising campaign with Takeda in select U.S. markets for AMITIZA. Sucampo, Takeda and R-Tech Ueno, Ltd. (RTU) entered into a settlement and license agreement with Anchen Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Par Pharmaceutical, Inc. and Par Pharmaceutical Companies, Inc. that resolved patent litigation among the parties related to AMITIZA 8 mcg and 24 mcg soft gelatin capsules. Signed an extension to our existing collaboration and license agreement with Takeda covering the U.S. and Canada for AMITIZA. Global Markets In Japan, Sucampo’s revenue from sales of AMITIZA to Abbott Japan Co., Ltd. (Abbott) for the third quarter of 2014 was $8.9 million, an increase of $3.7 million compared to the same period of 2013. Sucampo’s revenue from sales of AMITIZA to Abbott for the first nine months of 2014 was $22.2 million, an increase of $11.5 million compared to the same period of 2013. Sucampo also announced that it had earned a $2.5 million milestone payment from Abbott, pursuant to the existing license, commercialization and supply agreement. The milestone payment was triggered by the first occurrence of annual net sales of lubiprostone for chronic idiopathic constipation (CIC) in Japan exceeding JPY 5.0 billion. Entered into a global license, development, commercialization and supply agreement for AMITIZA with Takeda which expanded Takeda’s exclusive rights to all global markets except Japan and the People’s Republic of China. Signed an exclusive global manufacturing and supply agreement with RTU for clinical and commercial supplies of AMITIZA in most global markets. In the European Union (E.U.), the Mutual Recognition Procedure (MRP) started on October 31st to obtain approval in additional E.U. countries for AMITIZA for CIC. The MRP is anticipated to be completed in the first half of 2015. In Canada, Sucampo filed AMITIZA for the CIC and opioid-induced constipation (OIC) indications with Health Canada. A decision is anticipated in the second half of 2015. Research and Development In October, four abstracts on lubiprostone were presented at the American College of Gastroenterology 2014 Annual Scientific Meeting.   Corporate Peter Kiener, D. Phil was appointed Chief Scientific Officer. Matthias Alder was appointed Executive Vice President, Business Development & Licensing. Steven Caffé, M.D. was appointed Senior Vice President, Regulatory Affairs. Cary Claiborne, Chief Financial Officer (CFO), will leave Sucampo on November 7. A search for a new CFO is ongoing. Third Quarter 2014 Financial Review Net income was $1.5 million, or $0.03 per diluted share, for the third quarter of 2014 compared to a net income of $1.5 million, or $0.04 per diluted share, in the same period in 2013. Net income was $3.8 million, or $0.09 per diluted share, for the first nine months of 2014 compared to a net income of $4.7 million, or $0.11 per diluted share, in the same period in 2013. Total revenues were $31.5 million for the third quarter of 2014 compared to $21.2 million in the same period in 2013, an increase of 49%. Total revenues were $77.7 million for the first nine months of 2014 compared to $65.1 million in the same period in 2013, an increase of 19%. The increase for both periods was primarily due to higher royalty revenue on AMITIZA net sales in the U.S. and the growth of AMITIZA sales in Japan as well as a $2.5 million milestone earned in Japan. The increase for the nine months in 2014 royalty revenues and product sales from the same period in 2013 were offset by the 2013 receipt of the $10.0 million milestone payment from Takeda upon the first commercial sale of AMITIZA for OIC. Costs of goods sold were $5.0 million for the third quarter of 2014 compared to $6.3 million for the same period of 2013, a decrease of 21%. The decrease was primarily due to a $3.0 million non-cash write-off of RESCULA inventory in the prior year period which did not reoccur, partially offset by higher product purchases expenses as a result of increased volume of AMITIZA sales in Japan. Costs of goods sold were $12.2 million for the first nine months of 2014 compared to $9.5 million for the same period of 2013, an increase of 29%. The increase for the nine months was primarily due to increased volume of AMITIZA sales in Japan partially offset by the $3.0 million non-cash write-off of RESCULA inventory in the prior year which did not reoccur. Intangible assets impairment was $5.6 million for the third quarter of 2014 compared to nil for the same period of 2013. The non-cash impairment reflects a reduction in the expected future cash flows received from the sales of RESCULA in the FDA approved indication, which is no longer marketed and for which no orders have been placed for additional inventory. R&D expenses were $5.3 million for the third quarter of 2014 compared to $4.5 million for the same period of 2013, an increase of 18%. R&D expenses were $14.7 million for the first nine months of 2014 compared to $14.5 million for the same period of 2013, an increase of 1%. The increase for both periods was primarily due to increased costs of our lubiprostone pediatric trial. G&A expenses were $8.1 million for the third quarter of 2014 compared to $5.4 million for the same period of 2013, an increase of 49%. G&A expenses were $23.6 million for the first nine months of 2014 compared to $18.6 million for the same period of 2013, an increase of 27%. The increase for both periods was primarily due to a significant increase in legal fees incurred prosecuting a patent infringement lawsuit filed by us in February 2013. The increase for the nine months was partially offset by a reduction in pharmacovigilance costs that were associated with launching AMITIZA in Japan in 2013. Selling & Marketing expenses were $3.8 million for the third quarter of 2014 compared to $6.0 million for the same period of 2013, a decrease of 37%. Selling & Marketing expenses were $11.5 million for the first nine months of 2014 compared to $16.0 million for the same period of 2013, a decrease of 28%. The decrease for both periods was primarily due to the replacement of our in-house sales force with a lower-cost contract sales force in 2014 and a $1.5 million non-cash write-off of RESCULA in samples in the prior year that did not reoccur this year. The decrease for the first nine months of 2014 was partially offset by increased commercialization costs in Europe for AMITIZA. Earnings Excluding Special Items Net income excluding special items for the third quarter of 2014 was $6.3 million, or $0.14 per diluted share, compared to a net income of $4.0 million, or $0.09 per diluted share, in the third quarter of 2013. Net income excluding special items for the first nine months of 2014 was $8.6 million, or $0.20 per diluted share, compared to a net income of $7.0 million, or $0.16 per diluted share, in the first nine months of 2013. Non-GAAP (generally accepted accounting principles) EPS for the third quarter and nine months ended September 30, 2014 of $0.14 and $0.20, respectively, exclude RESCULA intangible impairment. A reconciliation of GAAP to non-GAAP net income and EPS is provided in the tables that follow. __________________________3.Represents the difference between calculated GAAP EPS and calculated non-GAAP EPS, which may be different than the amount calculated by dividing the impact of the excluded items by the weighted-average shares for the period. Cash, Cash Equivalents, Restricted Cash and Marketable Securities At September 30, 2014, cash, cash equivalents, restricted cash and investments were $106.4 million compared to $95.9 million at December 31, 2013. At September 30, 2014, notes payable were $48.1 million, compared to $52.7 million at December 31, 2013, including current notes payable of $26.3 million at September 30, 2014 and $26.9 million at December 31, 2013. Guidance Sucampo today increased its earnings guidance for 2014. Sucampo now expects full year 2014 GAAP net income, excluding special items to be in the range of $15.0 million to $20.0 million, or $0.35 to $0.45 per diluted share. 
 Company to Host Conference Call Today Sucampo will host a conference call and webcast today at 8:30 am Eastern. To participate on the live call, please dial 866-953-6858 (domestic) or 617-399-3482 (international), and provide the participant passcode 19360046, five to ten minutes ahead of the start of the call. A replay of the call will be available within a few hours after the call ends. Investors may listen to the replay by dialing 888-286-8010 (domestic) or 617-801-6888 (international), passcode 31546071. Investors interested in accessing the live audio webcast of the teleconference may do so at http://investor.sucampo.com and should log on before the teleconference begins in order to download any software required. The archive of the teleconference will remain available for 30 days.About lubiprostone (AMITIZA®) AMITIZA (lubiprostone) is a prostone, and is a locally acting chloride channel activator, indicated in the U.S. for the treatment of CIC in adults and OIC in adults with chronic, non-cancer pain (24 mcg twice daily). The effectiveness in patients with OIC taking diphenylheptane opioids (e.g., methadone) has not been established. AMITIZA is also indicated in the U.S. for irritable bowel syndrome with constipation (8 mcg twice daily) in women 18 years of age and older. In Japan, AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily) is indicated for the treatment of chronic constipation (excluding constipation caused by organic diseases). In the United Kingdom (U.K.), AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily) is indicated for the treatment of CIC and associated symptoms in adults, when response to diet and other non-pharmacological measures (e.g., educational measures, physical activity) are inappropriate. In Switzerland, AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily) is indicated for the treatment of CIC in adults and for the treatment of OIC and associated signs and symptoms such as stool consistency, straining, constipation severity, abdominal discomfort, and abdominal bloating in adults with chronic, non-cancer pain. The efficacy of AMITIZA for the treatment of OIC in patients taking opioids of the diphenylheptane class, such as methadone, has not been established. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of product candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the U.K. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com. The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals).Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; the ability of Sucampo to develop and commercialize existing and pipeline products; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally; the effects of competitive products on Sucampo’s products; and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 10-K as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 12, 2014 as well as its filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-Q and 8-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com
Comments (0)5th November 2014Sucampo Pharmaceuticals Announces Webcast of Its Presentation at the 2014 Credit Suisse Global Healthcare ConferenceFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 11:07 amBETHESDA, Md., November 5, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (Nasdaq:SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that it will webcast its corporate presentation at the 2014 Credit Suisse Global Healthcare Conference taking place Wednesday, November 12, 2014 at 3:30 pm Mountain Time, or 5:30 pm Eastern Time.The presentation will be webcast live and may be accessed from the Event Calendar page of Sucampo’s website at http://investor.sucampo.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=201197&p=irol-calendar. Presentation slides will be available via the webcast links. A replay of the webcast will also be available on the Company’s website for several days after the live event. To ensure a timely connection, it is recommended that users register at least 15 minutes prior to the scheduled webcast. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of drug candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals).Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; the ability of Sucampo to develop and commercialize existing and pipeline products; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 10-K as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 12, 2014 as well as its filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-Q and 8-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate CommunicationsSucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com   
Comments (0)24th October 2014Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Announces Third Quarter 2014 Earnings CallFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 11:06 amBETHESDA, MD., October 24, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that it will host its third quarter 2014 financial results teleconference and webcast at 8:30 a.m. Eastern on Thursday, November 6, 2014. The press release announcing the financial results and operating highlights is expected to be released before the opening of capital markets that day. Individuals interested in accessing the live audio webcast of the teleconference may do so at http://investor.sucampo.com/phoenix.zhtml?c=201197&p=irol-calendar and should log on 10 to 15 minutes before the teleconference begins to download any software required. Presentation slides will be available via the webcast link. A replay of the webcast will also be available on Sucampo’s website for several days after the live event. Alternatively, individuals may dial 866-953-6858 (domestic) or 617-399-3482 (international) and use passcode 19360046. A replay of the teleconference will be available by dialing 888-286-8010 (domestic) or 617-801-6888 (international), passcode 31546071, approximately two hours after the teleconference concludes. The archive of the teleconference will be available for 30 days. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of drug candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals).Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; the ability of Sucampo to develop and commercialize existing and pipeline products; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 10-K as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 12, 2014 as well as its filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-Q and 8-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate CommunicationsSucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com 
Comments (0)23rd October 2014Sucampo Solidifies Leadership Team with Additions of CSO and Heads of Business Development, Regulatory AffairsFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 10:51 amBethesda, Md., October 23, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced three executive appointments that expand and solidify the leadership team in line with the company’s strategic plan. The appointments are Peter Kiener, D.Phil            , as Chief Scientific Officer (CSO); Matthias Alder as Executive Vice President, Business Development and Licensing; and Steven Caffé, M.D., as Senior Vice President, Regulatory Affairs. “We are building a stronger, focused company, and filling our key leadership roles with these high-caliber executives is essential for Sucampo’s continued evolution,” said Peter Greenleaf, Chief Executive Officer of Sucampo. “The addition of tenured biopharmaceutical executives gives us the depth of scientific leadership to expedite our company’s transformation and to execute on our priorities of leveraging Sucampo’s strengths in drug development, securing and growing revenue from sales of AMITIZA, increasing our pace of current pipeline development and diversifying our portfolio through the acquisition of new science. Each of the new executives brings to Sucampo functional expertise and a track record of success, and each of them sees, as I do, the potential of our strategic vision for Sucampo.” Dr. Kiener is recognized for his expertise in the development of next-generation biologics. Most recently, he was CSO of Ambrx Inc., a clinical-stage biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of antibody-drug conjugates. Prior to joining Ambrx, Dr. Kiener was President and Co-founder of Zyngenia Inc., an early stage biopharmaceutical company. Before this, he was Executive Vice President and Global Head of Biologics Research and Development at MedImmune, LLC, the global biologics arm of AstraZeneca. During his tenure there, Dr. Kiener assisted with building the company’s industry-leading protein and antibody engineering capabilities and oversaw the submission of multiple investigational new drug and new drug applications. Earlier in his career, he held multiple positions at Bristol-Myers Squibb over an 18-year period, where he worked on biologics. Dr. Kiener has served on the scientific advisory boards of KAI Pharmaceuticals Inc., Genocea Biosciences Inc., NKT Therapeutics Inc. and VLST Corporation. Dr. Kiener has also served as a director of Receptor BioLogix Inc., Synovex Corporation and Virdante Pharmaceuticals Inc. He received his bachelor’s degree in chemistry from the University of Lancaster and doctorate of philosophy in Biochemistry from the University of Oxford. Dr. Kiener has published more than 120 papers in peer-reviewed journals and is an inventor on more than 40 patents and patent applications. Mr. Alder brings more than 20 years of industry experience to Sucampo. Most recently, he was Executive Vice President of Corporate Development and Legal Affairs and Corporate Secretary at Cytos Biotechnology AG, a biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of targeted immuno-therapies. Prior to joining Cytos, he held various roles of increasing responsibility, including Senior Vice President Administration, General Counsel and Secretary of Micromet Inc., which was acquired by Amgen. Prior to this, Mr. Alder was a partner in the Life Sciences Transactions Practice at Cooley LLP, where he represented biotech companies in strategic transactions with pharmaceutical companies. Earlier in his career, Mr. Alder was in-house counsel at Ciba-Geigy and Novartis. He holds law degrees from the University of Basel and the University of Miami and is qualified to practice law in Switzerland and the U.S. Dr. Caffé brings more than 20 years of global product development, registration and lifecycle management expertise to the company. Prior to joining Sucampo, he was Senior Vice President and Chief Development and Regulatory Officer at AMAG Pharmaceuticals Inc., a specialty pharmaceutical company, where he played a key role in the provision of strategic insight and operational expertise to ensure successful product development and advancement, and in the acquisition of assets. Prior to joining AMAG, Dr. Caffé was Senior Vice President, Head of Global Regulatory Affairs and Patient Safety at MedImmune. At MedImmune, he was responsible for all regulatory and pharmacovigilance matters for commercial and pipeline products. Prior to this, he held increasing leadership positions at Baxter International Inc., Sanofi and Merck & Co. Through various regulatory and development programs, he secured product approvals while building and leading high-performing global teams. Dr. Caffé received his medical degree from the Faculté de Médecine Saint-Antoine, Université Pierre et Marie Curie (Paris 6), and completed his internship and residency and practiced medicine at the academic hospitals of the Assistance Publique de Paris with a focus on emergency and intensive care. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of product candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the U.K. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a registered/pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals). Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com
Comments (0)21st October 2014Takeda and Sucampo Enter Into Global Licensing Agreement for AMITIZA® (lubiprostone)Filed under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 10:43 amTakeda Gains Exclusive Rights to AMITIZA Beyond U.S. and Canada for All Markets Except Japan and China  BETHESDA, Md., October 21, 2014 and OSAKA, Japan, October 22, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, and Takeda Pharmaceutical Company Limited (Takeda) today announced that on October 17, 2014, they entered into a global license, development, commercialization and supply agreement for AMITIZA® (lubiprostone). Through this agreement, Takeda expanded its exclusive rights beyond the United States (U.S.) and Canada to further develop and commercialize AMITIZA in all global markets, except Japan and the People’s Republic of China. “Takeda is committed to being a patient and customer-centric organization, making quality health products available to the patients who need them. Through this agreement, AMITIZA can now be made available to patients worldwide,” said Shinji Honda, Senior Managing Director and Corporate Strategy Officer. “Takeda forms partnerships to advance science and to provide innovative treatment options for patients, and this global agreement is an excellent example. This global collaboration leverages the expertise we have established through our gastroenterology portfolio of products.” “The expansion of our collaboration with Takeda represents a critical step forward with our strategic plan and is the natural evolution of our partnership with them for North America,” said Peter Greenleaf, Chief Executive Officer of Sucampo. “This agreement allows Sucampo to remain focused on our strengths in drug development while allowing us to make AMITIZA available to more patients in need around the world. We are confident that with the combination of their extensive experience with AMITIZA and proven global infrastructure, that Takeda will build the brand in new global markets as they have done in the U.S., where AMITIZA continues to grow steadily.” Under the terms of the agreement, Sucampo will receive an upfront payment of $14 million from Takeda and will also be eligible for up to $35 million in additional commercial milestones contingent on the achievement of certain net sales revenue targets. Additionally, Sucampo will be the exclusive supplier of AMITIZA to Takeda at an agreed-upon supply price. Takeda will be responsible for all development activities and costs, with Sucampo assuming responsibility for the first $6 million in development expenses. In addition, Takeda will become the marketing authorization holder and will be responsible for all commercialization and regulatory activities. About AMITIZA (lubiprostone) AMITIZA (lubiprostone) is a prostone and is a locally acting chloride channel activator, indicated in the United States for the treatment of chronic idiopathic constipation (CIC) in adults and opioid-induced constipation (OIC) in adults with chronic, non-cancer pain (24 mcg twice daily). The effectiveness in patients with OIC taking diphenylheptane opioids (e.g., methadone) has not been established. AMITIZA is also indicated in the U.S. for irritable bowel syndrome with constipation (IBS-C) (8 mcg twice daily) in women 18 years of age and older. Important Safety InformationAMITIZA (lubiprostone) is contraindicated in patients with known or suspected mechanical gastrointestinal obstruction. Patients with symptoms suggestive of mechanical gastrointestinal obstruction should be thoroughly evaluated by the treating healthcare provider (HCP) to confirm the absence of such an obstruction prior to initiating AMITIZA treatment. Patients taking AMITIZA may experience nausea. If this occurs, concomitant administration of food with AMITIZA may reduce symptoms of nausea. Patients who experience severe nausea should inform their HCP. AMITIZA should not be prescribed to patients that have severe diarrhea. Patients should be aware of the possible occurrence of diarrhea during treatment. Patients should be instructed to discontinue AMITIZA and inform their HCP if severe diarrhea occurs. Patients taking AMITIZA may experience dyspnea within an hour of first dose. This symptom generally resolves within three hours, but may recur with repeat dosing. Patients who experience dyspnea should inform their HCP. Some patients have discontinued therapy because of dyspnea. In clinical trials of AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily vs placebo; N=1113 vs N=316, respectively) in patients with CIC, the most common adverse reactions (incidence > 4%) were nausea (29% vs 3%), diarrhea (12% vs 1%), headache (11% vs 5%), abdominal pain (8% vs 3%), abdominal distension (6% vs 2%), and flatulence (6% vs 2%). In clinical trials of AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily vs placebo; N=860 vs N=632, respectively) in patients with OIC, the most common adverse reactions (incidence >4%) were nausea (11% vs 5%) and diarrhea (8% vs 2%). In clinical trials of AMITIZA (8 mcg twice daily vs placebo; N=1011 vs N=435, respectively) in patients with IBS-C the most common adverse reactions (incidence > 4%) were nausea (8% vs 4%), diarrhea (7% vs 4%), and abdominal pain (5% vs 5%). Concomitant use of diphenylheptane opioids (e.g., methadone) may interfere with the efficacy of AMITIZA. The safety of AMITIZA in pregnancy has not been evaluated in humans. Based on animal data, AMITIZA may cause fetal harm. AMITIZA should be used during pregnancy only if the potential benefit justifies the potential risk to the fetus. Caution should be exercised when AMITIZA is administered to a nursing woman. Advise nursing women to monitor infants for diarrhea. Reduce the dosage in CIC and OIC patients with moderate and severe hepatic impairment. Reduce the dosage in IBS-C patients with severe hepatic impairment. Please see the Full Prescribing Information here. For further information on AMITIZA, please visit www.sucampo.com/products. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of product candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com. The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals). Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; the ability of Sucampo to develop and commercialize existing and pipeline products; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally; the effects of competitive products on Sucampo’s products; and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 10-K as filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on March 12, 2014 as well as its filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission on Form 10-Q and 8-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. About Takeda Pharmaceutical Company Limited Located in Osaka, Japan, Takeda is a research-based global company with its main focus on pharmaceuticals. As the largest pharmaceutical company in Japan and one of the global leaders of the industry, Takeda is committed to strive towards better health for people worldwide through leading innovation in medicine. Additional information about Takeda is available through its corporate website, www.takeda.com. Takeda Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements include statements regarding Takeda’s plans, outlook, strategies, results for the future, and other statements that are not descriptions of historical facts. Forward-looking statements may be identified by the use of forward-looking words such as “may,” “believe,” “will,” “expect,” “project,” “estimate,” “should,” “anticipate,” “plan,” “assume,” “continue,” “seek,” “pro forma,” “potential,” “target,” “forecast,” “guidance,” “outlook” or “intend” or other similar words or expressions of the negative thereof. Forward-looking statements are based on estimates and assumptions made by management that are believed to be reasonable, though they are inherently uncertain and difficult to predict. Investors are cautioned not to unduly rely on such forward-looking statements. Forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that could cause actual results or experience to differ materially from that expressed or implied by the forward-looking statements. Some of these risks and uncertainties include, but are not limited to, (1) the economic circumstances surrounding Takeda’s business, including general economic conditions in Japan, the U.S. and worldwide; (2) competitive pressures and developments; (3) applicable laws and regulations; (4) the success or failure of product development programs; (5) actions of regulatory authorities and the timing thereof; (6) changes in exchange rates; (7) claims or concerns regarding the safety or efficacy of marketed products or product candidates in development; and (8) integration activities with acquired companies. The forward-looking statements contained in this press release speak only as of the date of this press release, and Takeda undertakes no obligation to revise or update any forward-looking statements to reflect new information, future events or circumstances after the date of the forward-looking statement. If Takeda does update or correct one or more of these statements, investors and others should not conclude that Takeda will make additional updates or corrections. Contact: Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com Takeda Pharmaceutical Company LimitedCorporate Communications Dept.Tel: +81-3-3278-2037 Takeda Pharmaceuticals International, Inc.Jocelyn GerstCorporate Communications Dept.Tel: +1-224-554-5542
Comments (0)17th October 2014Clinical Data for AMITIZA® Lubiprostone to Be Presented at the American College of Gastroenterology 2014 Annual Scientific MeetingFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 10:24 amBETHESDA, Md., October 13, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that clinical data for AMITIZA® lubiprostone will be presented at the American College of Gastroenterology (ACG) 2014 Annual Scientific Meeting on Sunday, October 19, and Monday, October 20, at the Pennsylvania Convention Center in Philadelphia. Poster Presentations The following abstracts will be presented at ACG 2014: Sunday, Oct. 19, from 3:30 p.m. to 7 p.m. EDTWeek 2 Response Predicts Durable Response to Lubiprostone in Patients With Chronic Idiopathic Constipation (Ayesha Akbar, MBChB (Hons), MRCP, PhD; Taryn Losch-Beridon, BS; Martin Wang, MS; Peter Lichtlen, MD, PhD)Poster No: P499 Impact of Methadone Dose and Baseline Bowel Movement Frequency on Efficacy of Lubiprostone for Opioid-Induced Constipation (Byron Cryer, MD; Peter Lichtlen, MD, PhD; Martin Wang, MS; Taryn Losch-Beridon, BS)Poster No: P500Monday, Oct. 20, from 10:30 a.m. to 4 p.m. EDTEffects of Lubiprostone, in Patients With Chronic Idiopathic and Opioid-Induced Constipation, on Serum Electrolytes and Markers of Renal Function (Satish S. C. Rao, MD, PhD, FACG; Egilius L. H. Spierings, MD, PhD; John F. Johanson, MD, MSc, FACP, FACG; Peter Lichtlen, MD, PhD; Sepideh Habibi, MD)Poster no: P1102 Lubiprostone for Treatment of Opioid-Induced Constipation: Analysis of Influencing Factors (Taryn Losch-Beridon, BS; Peter Lichtlen, MD, PhD; Martin Wang, MS)Poster No: P1105 About AMITIZA (lubiprostone) AMITIZA (lubiprostone) is a prostone, and is a locally acting chloride channel activator, indicated in the United States for the treatment of chronic idiopathic constipation (CIC) in adults and opioid-induced constipation (OIC) in adults with chronic, non-cancer pain (24 mcg twice daily). The effectiveness in patients with OIC taking diphenylheptane opioids (e.g., methadone) has not been established. AMITIZA is also indicated in the U.S. for irritable bowel syndrome with constipation (IBS-C) (8 mcg twice daily) in women 18 years of age and older. Important Safety InformationAMITIZA (lubiprostone) is contraindicated in patients with known or suspected mechanical gastrointestinal obstruction. Patients with symptoms suggestive of mechanical gastrointestinal obstruction should be thoroughly evaluated by the treating healthcare provider (HCP) to confirm the absence of such an obstruction prior to initiating AMITIZA treatment. Patients taking AMITIZA may experience nausea. If this occurs, concomitant administration of food with AMITIZA may reduce symptoms of nausea. Patients who experience severe nausea should inform their HCP. AMITIZA should not be prescribed to patients that have severe diarrhea. Patients should be aware of the possible occurrence of diarrhea during treatment. Patients should be instructed to discontinue AMITIZA and inform their HCP if severe diarrhea occurs. Patients taking AMITIZA may experience dyspnea within an hour of first dose. This symptom generally resolves within three hours, but may recur with repeat dosing. Patients who experience dyspnea should inform their HCP. Some patients have discontinued therapy because of dyspnea. In clinical trials of AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily vs placebo; N=1113 vs N=316, respectively) in patients with CIC, the most common adverse reactions (incidence > 4%) were nausea (29% vs 3%), diarrhea (12% vs < 1%), headache (11% vs 5%), abdominal pain (8% vs 3%), abdominal distension (6% vs 2%), and flatulence (6% vs 2%). In clinical trials of AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily vs. placebo; N=860 vs. N=632) in patients with OIC, the most common adverse reactions (incidence > 4%) were nausea (11% vs 5%) and diarrhea (8% vs 2%). In clinical trials of AMITIZA (8 mcg twice daily vs. placebo; N=1011 vs. N=435, respectively) in patients with IBS-C the most common adverse reactions (incidence > 4%) were nausea (8% vs 4%), diarrhea (7% vs 4%), and abdominal pain (5% vs 5%). Concomitant use of diphenylheptane opioids (e.g., methadone) may interfere with the efficacy of AMITIZA. The safety of AMITIZA in pregnancy has not been evaluated in humans. Based on animal data, AMITIZA may cause fetal harm. AMITIZA should be used during pregnancy only if the potential benefit justifies the potential risk to the fetus. Caution should be exercised when AMITIZA is administered to a nursing woman. Advise nursing women to monitor infants for diarrhea. Reduce the dosage in CIC and OIC patients with moderate and severe hepatic impairment. Reduce the dosage in IBS-C patients with severe hepatic impairment. Please see the Full Prescribing Information here. For further information on AMITIZA, please visit www.sucampo.com/products. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines to meet the major unmet medical needs of patients on a global basis. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of product candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the U.K. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com. The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals). Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com 
Comments (0)14th October 2014Sucampo Announces Extension of AMITIZA® (lubiprostone) License and Collaboration Agreement with TakedaFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 10:22 amBETHESDA, Md., October 14, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) – Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that it signed on October 9, 2014 an amendment to the existing collaboration and license agreement (Collaboration Agreement) covering the United States (U.S.) and Canada for AMITIZA® (lubiprostone) with Takeda Pharmaceutical Company Ltd. (Takeda). The amendment includes various modifications to the Collaboration Agreement including the extension of the current term, minimum commercial investment during the current term and various governance changes allowing Takeda additional flexibility in commercializing AMITIZA. During the extended term, which will begin on January 1, 2021, Takeda will split with Sucampo the gross profits of branded AMITIZA for any dosage strength and form for the existing indications in the U.S. and Canada. In addition, on April 1, 2015 Takeda will no longer reimburse Sucampo for the product details made by Sucampo sales representatives to healthcare professionals as well as other ancillary costs of the sales force. “Today’s announcement of the extended collaboration with Takeda is yet another step toward achieving our objective of securing Sucampo’s foundation and expanding the AMITIZA business. This extended collaboration also allows Sucampo to share in the long-term value of AMITIZA,” said Peter Greenleaf, Chief Executive Officer of Sucampo. “Takeda and Sucampo are aligned in our objectives for the brand, and I believe this newly extended collaboration and license agreement positions the companies more strongly than ever to help grow the AMITIZA business.”  About AMITIZA (lubiprostone) AMITIZA (lubiprostone) is a prostone and is a locally acting chloride channel activator, indicated in the U.S. for the treatment of chronic idiopathic constipation (CIC) in adults and opioid-induced constipation (OIC) in adults with chronic, non-cancer pain (24 mcg twice daily). The effectiveness in patients with OIC taking diphenylheptane opioids (e.g., methadone) has not been established. AMITIZA is also indicated in the U.S. for irritable bowel syndrome with constipation (IBS-C) (8 mcg twice daily) in women 18 years of age and older. Important Safety InformationAMITIZA (lubiprostone) is contraindicated in patients with known or suspected mechanical gastrointestinal obstruction. Patients with symptoms suggestive of mechanical gastrointestinal obstruction should be thoroughly evaluated by the treating healthcare provider (HCP) to confirm the absence of such an obstruction prior to initiating AMITIZA treatment. Patients taking AMITIZA may experience nausea. If this occurs, concomitant administration of food with AMITIZA may reduce symptoms of nausea. Patients who experience severe nausea should inform their HCP. AMITIZA should not be prescribed to patients that have severe diarrhea. Patients should be aware of the possible occurrence of diarrhea during treatment. Patients should be instructed to discontinue AMITIZA and inform their HCP if severe diarrhea occurs. Patients taking AMITIZA may experience dyspnea within an hour of first dose. This symptom generally resolves within three hours, but may recur with repeat dosing. Patients who experience dyspnea should inform their HCP. Some patients have discontinued therapy because of dyspnea. In clinical trials of AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily vs placebo; N=1113 vs N=316, respectively) in patients with CIC, the most common adverse reactions (incidence > 4%) were nausea (29% vs 3%), diarrhea (12% vs 1%), headache (11% vs 5%), abdominal pain (8% vs 3%), abdominal distension (6% vs 2%), and flatulence (6% vs 2%). In clinical trials of AMITIZA (24 mcg twice daily vs placebo; N=860 vs N=632, respectively) in patients with OIC, the most common adverse reactions (incidence >4%) were nausea (11% vs 5%) and diarrhea (8% vs 2%). In clinical trials of AMITIZA (8 mcg twice daily vs placebo; N=1011 vs N=435, respectively) in patients with IBS-C the most common adverse reactions (incidence > 4%) were nausea (8% vs 4%), diarrhea (7% vs 4%), and abdominal pain (5% vs 5%). Concomitant use of diphenylheptane opioids (e.g., methadone) may interfere with the efficacy of AMITIZA. The safety of AMITIZA in pregnancy has not been evaluated in humans. Based on animal data, AMITIZA may cause fetal harm. AMITIZA should be used during pregnancy only if the potential benefit justifies the potential risk to the fetus. Caution should be exercised when AMITIZA is administered to a nursing woman. Advise nursing women to monitor infants for diarrhea. Reduce the dosage in CIC and OIC patients with moderate and severe hepatic impairment. Reduce the dosage in IBS-C patients with severe hepatic impairment. Please see the Full Prescribing Information here. For further information on AMITIZA, please visit www.sucampo.com/products. About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of product candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the U.K. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com. The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals). Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com 
Comments (0)9th October 2014Sucampo Announces Settlement Agreement That Resolves Patent Litigation in U.S. Related to AMITIZAFiled under: Uncategorised —  djm @ 10:19 amCompany Receives Additional Paragraph IV Notice Bethesda, Maryland, October 9, 2014 (GLOBE NEWSWIRE) — Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. (Sucampo) (NASDAQ: SCMP), a global biopharmaceutical company, today announced that Sucampo, R-Tech Ueno, Ltd. (RTU), Takeda Pharmaceutical Company Limited (Takeda) and certain affiliates of Takeda have entered into a settlement and license agreement with Anchen Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Par Pharmaceutical, Inc., and Par Pharmaceutical Companies, Inc., (collectively, Par) that resolves patent litigation in the United States (U.S.) related to Sucampo’s AMITIZA® (lubiprostone) 8 mcg and 24 mcg soft gelatin capsules. Under the terms of the settlement, Sucampo and RTU will grant Par a non-exclusive license to market Par’s generic version of lubiprostone 8 mcg soft gelatin capsule and 24 mcg soft gelatin capsule (licensed products) in the U.S. for the indications approved for AMITIZA beginning January 1, 2021, or earlier under certain circumstances. Beginning on January 1, 2021, Par will split with Sucampo the gross profits of the licensed products sold during the term of the agreement, which continues until each of the Sucampo patents has expired. In the event Par elects to launch an authorized generic, Sucampo will supply Par under the terms of a manufacturing and supply agreement at a negotiated price. Additional details of the agreement remain confidential. “This settlement agreement is an important step for Sucampo toward securing our foundation and continuing to grow sales of AMITIZA,” said Peter Greenleaf, Chief Executive Officer of Sucampo. “We are on track with the strategic imperatives I communicated in August that include a sharp focus on our flagship product. This is not only beneficial to our company and shareholders, it is important to prescribing physicians and their patients who depend on AMITIZA for treatment.” Sucampo, RTU, Takeda and Par have agreed to dismiss with prejudice the patent litigation filed in the U.S. District Court for the District of Delaware. Additionally, Sucampo said it has received a Paragraph IV certification notice letter (Notice Letter) regarding an Abbreviated New Drug Application (ANDA) submitted to the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) by Dr. Reddy’s Laboratories, Inc. (Dr. Reddy’s), requesting approval to market, sell and use a generic version of the 8 mcg and 24 mcg AMITIZA® (lubiprostone) soft gelatin capsule products. Sucampo is currently reviewing the Notice Letter. By statute, if Sucampo initiates a patent infringement lawsuit against Dr. Reddy’s within 45 days of the Notice Date, the FDA would automatically stay approval of the Dr. Reddy’s ANDA until the earlier of 30 months from the notice date or entry of a district court decision finding the patents invalid or not infringed. The product is currently protected by 15 issued patents that are listed in the FDA’s Orange Book, with the latest expiring in 2027. “We will continue to vigorously enforce AMITIZA’s intellectual property rights,” said Greenleaf. “Generic companies have made Paragraph IV certifications a routine part of business. Sucampo is well prepared to pursue all legal pathways in defense of AMITIZA.” About Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of medicines that meet unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA® and RESCULA® – and a pipeline of product candidates in clinical development. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Bethesda, Maryland, and has operations in Japan, Switzerland and the United Kingdom. For more information, please visit www.sucampo.com.The Sucampo logo is the registered trademark and the tagline, The Science of Innovation, is a pending trademark of Sucampo AG. AMITIZA is a registered trademark of Sucampo AG. RESCULA is a registered trademark of R-Tech Ueno, Ltd, and has been licensed to Sucampo AG. Follow us on Twitter (@Sucampo_Pharma). Follow us on LinkedIn (Sucampo Pharmaceuticals). Twitter LinkedIn Sucampo Forward-Looking Statement This press release contains “forward-looking statements” as that term is defined in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. These statements are based on management’s current expectations and involve risks and uncertainties, which may cause results to differ materially from those set forth in the statements. The forward-looking statements may include statements regarding product development, product potential, future financial and operating results, and other statements that are not historical facts. The following factors, among others, could cause actual results to differ from those set forth in the forward-looking statements: the impact of pharmaceutical industry regulation and health care legislation; Sucampo’s ability to accurately predict future market conditions; dependence on the effectiveness of Sucampo’s patents and other protections for innovative products; the risk of new and changing regulation and health policies in the U.S. and internationally and the exposure to litigation and/or regulatory actions. No forward-looking statement can be guaranteed and actual results may differ materially from those projected. Sucampo undertakes no obligation to publicly update any forward-looking statement, whether as a result of new information, future events, or otherwise. Forward-looking statements in this presentation should be evaluated together with the many uncertainties that affect Sucampo’s business, particularly those mentioned in the risk factors and cautionary statements in Sucampo’s most recent Form 8-K and 10-K, which Sucampo incorporates by reference. Contact:Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.Silvia TaylorSenior Vice President, Investor Relations and Corporate Communications1-240-223-3718staylor@sucampo.com
Comments (0)Contact Us Tel: +1-301-961-3400Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
805 King Farm Boulevard, Suite 550 Rockville, Maryland 20850info@sucampo.com 
Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is focused on the development and commercialization of specialized medicines that meet major unmet medical needs of patients worldwide. Sucampo has two marketed products – AMITIZA, its lead product, and RESCULA – and a late-stage pipeline of product candidates in clinical development for orphan disease areas. VTS-270 is a mixture of 2-hydroxypropyl-B-cyclodextrins with a specific compositional fingerprint that has been granted orphan designation in the U.S. and Europe and is in a pivotal Phase 2/3 clinical trial for the treatment of Niemann-Pick Disease Type C-1. Sucampo has an option for the North American rights to CPP1- x/sulindac, which is in Phase 3 development for the treatment of familial adenomatous polyposis and has been granted orphan drug designation in the U.S. A global company, Sucampo is headquartered in Rockville, Maryland, and has operations in Japan and Switzerland.
      




Matthias Alder





























About us




Overview





Executive Team





Board of Directors



 

Technology




Overview





Abstracts & Publications



 

Investors





News and Events




Press Releases





Events



 

Careers





Contact Us

















EXECUTIVE TEAM
We share a passion for delivering new treatments which offer substantial benefits for patients. Drawing upon our depth of experience and diversity of skills, Autolus is committed to building a leading T-cell therapy company.















Matthias AlderSVP, Chief Business Officer and General Counsel          Matthias Alder joined Autolus as Chief Business Officer and General Counsel in July 2017.  Previously, he served as Executive Vice President, Business Development and Licensing, of Sucampo Pharmaceuticals Inc. from October 2014 to March 2017, and as General Counsel and Corporate Secretary of the company from May 2015 to June 2017. During his tenure at Sucampo, Matthias established a late stage development pipeline in orphan and rare diseases through acquisitions and strategic collaborations, and improved the top and bottom line of the company through the acquisition of the Japanese manufacturer of its only revenue-producing product. Prior to joining Sucampo, he served as Executive Vice President of Corporate Development and Legal Affairs and Corporate Secretary at Cytos Biotechnology AG, a biopharmaceutical company focused on the development of targeted immunotherapies, from 2013 to October 2014. From 2006 to 2012, Matthias held various executive management roles at Micromet, Inc., serving as Senior Vice President Administration, General Counsel and Secretary at the time of the acquisition of Micromet by Amgen in 2012. Earlier in his career, Matthias was a partner in the Life Sciences Transactions Practice at Cooley LLP from 2000 to 2006, after joining the firm as an associate in 1997 from Novartis, where he was in-house counsel for its pharmaceutical business. Matthias holds law degrees from the University of Basel and the University of Miami and is qualified to practice law in Switzerland and the United States.








 








Matthias Alder - Former Executive Vice President, General Counsel & Corporate Secretary at Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.



























































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              




























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Matthias Alder
Former Executive Vice President, General Counsel & Corporate Secretary at Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.



Overview
In The News Relationships Paths
Education Career History Boards & Committees Political Donations Public Holdings Transactions 


Matthias Alder
Former Executive Vice President, General Counsel & Corporate Secretary at Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.



 Overview



Age



52
                                  (Born 1965)
                                              




Notable Companies


Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.

Amgen Rockville, Inc.




Board Seats



1





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 818 people.
              






 In The News
          See more




AWP OTS (Original Text Service)
October 27, 2014





                        OTS NEWS: Cytos Biotechnology AG / DGAP-Adhoc: Cytos Biotechnology ...                    





Washington Business Journal
October 23, 2014





                        Sucampo hires former Zyngenia chief Peter Kiener as CSO                    





PR Newswire
April 25, 2013





                        Cytos Biotechnology Ltd Reports First Quarter 2013 Financial Resultsand Recent Development.                    





PR Newswire
April 25, 2013





                        Cytos Biotechnology Ltd Reports First Quarter 2013 Financial Results and Recent Development                    





PR Newswire
March 12, 2013





                        Cytos Biotechnology Strengthens Management Team.                    







See full news coverage and complete stories with RelSci Professional.

Create Your News Feed








See  More 






 Relationships
              See Details




Brian F. Leaf

Partner at Cooley LLP




Christian E. Plaza

Partner at Cooley LLP





Darren K. Destefano

Partner at Cooley LLP




Christian Itin

Chairman & Chief Executive Officer at Autolus Ltd.





Ken Krisko

Partner at Cooley LLP




Howard Morse

Partner at Cooley LLP





David Walsh

Partner at Cooley LLP




Daniel P. Meehan

Partner at Kirkland & Ellis LLP





Shannon Gallagher-Bolton

Chief Human Resources Officer at Cooley LLP




Ashlie A. Lawton

Former Associate at Cooley LLP







See 808 more listings with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 808 More 


 


 Paths to Matthias Alder



            Matthias Alder          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Matthias Alder






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Matthias Alder.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



 
Class of 1988 


University of Basel

                  The University of Basel is the oldest university in Switzerland.  Founded upon the initiative of local citizens in 1460, the University of Basel is a modern and attractive center of teaching, learning, and research situated in the heart of Basel.

The University of Basel has been self-managed since 1996 whilst remaining under the jurisdiction of the Cantons of Basel-Stadt and Basel-Landschaft. It provides committed individuals from all over the world a strong academic community and an inspiring work environment.  It employs nearly 3,500 people, and its annual budget is around CHF 550 million.

The University of Basel is a classic university covering almost all fields of study from Ancient Studies to Zoology.

The University of Basel is a rather small university in European standards with around 11,000 students, including 2,000 doctoral students (as of 2007). Around 320 professors and 1,300 lecturers provide an excellent education and encourage independent thinking and responsible action. The proportion of female students is 55% - and rising - and one of five students come from abroad.

The University of Basel seeks top performance in research, teaching and service. For years, it is among the 100 best universities in the world, and in the German-speaking world it is one of the top ten.                




Law 


University of Miami - School of Law

                  The University of Miami School of Law, founded in 1926, is the law school of the University of Miami, located in Coral Gables, Florida, in the United States. The school graduated its first class of 13 students in 1929. The University of Miami School of Law also offers extensive "Public Interest Programs" and opportunities, including the "Center for Ethics and Public Service" that offers in-house clinics and educational programs including the "Children and Youth Law Clinic", "Health and Elder Law Clinic", and "Corporate & Professional Responsibility Program". The HOPE Public Interest Resource Center at the University of Miami School of Law gives students the opportunity to get involved in over 25 different projects each year, reaching various underserved and at-risk populations locally, nationally, and abroad.The University of Miami School of Law is located on the main campus of the University of Miami in Coral Gables, just six miles southeast of Miami, the 7th largest metropolitan area in the nation. The School of Law is centered around a central courtyard called the "Bricks." The Law Library has a collection of over 600,000 volumes in print and microform, and subscribes to a large and ever-expanding list of electronic resources.                





 Career History



Executive Vice President, General Counsel & Corporate Secretary

                                    2014 - 2017                


Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc.


                  Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. is a biopharmaceutical company, which is engaged in developing, identifying, acquiring and bringing medicines that meet unmet medical needs. It focuses on gastroenterology, ophthalmology, and oncology-related disorders. The company's product pipeline includes AMITIZA for the treatment of chronic idiopathic constipation in adults; irritable bowel syndrome with constipation in adult women; opioid-induced constipation in patients with chronic non-cancer pain; chronic constipation; and pediatric functional constipation. Its product pipeline also consists of Unoprostone Isopropyl, which is in Phase III trial for the treatment of retinitis pigmentosa and in pre-clinical stage for the treatment of geographic atrophy; and Cobiprostone that has completed Phase Ib trial for the treatment of oral mucositis, as well as in Phase II trial for the treatment of non-erosive reflux diseases. Sucampo Pharmaceuticals was founded by Dr. Ryuji Ueno and Dr. Sachiko Kuno on December 5, 1996 and is headquartered in Bethesda, MD.                




Secretary & Executive Vice President-Corporate Development

                                    2013 - 2014                


Cytos Biotechnology AG


                  Cytos Biotechnology AG engages in the development and commercialization of biopharmaceutical products. The company was founded by Wolfgang A. Renner, James E. Bailey and Hans M. Eppenberger in February 1995 and is headquartered in Zurich, Switzerland.                




Secretary, Senior Vice President-Administration & General Counsel

                                    2006 - 2012                


Amgen Rockville, Inc.


                  Amgen Rockville, Inc. develops and commercializes antibody-based products. Its product development pipeline includes novel antibodies generated with its BiTE antibody platform, as well as conventional monoclonal antibodies. The company was founded in 1993 and is headquartered in Rockville, MD.                




Partner

                                    1997 - 2006                


Cooley LLP


                  Cooley LLP is a provider of strategic litigation and business transaction services and is a representative of private and public companies, financial institutions, venture capital firms and nonprofit organizations. The company was founded in 1920 and is headquartered in New York, NY.                




Counsel

                                    Prior                


Novartis, Inc.


                  Novartis is dedicated to providing healthcare solutions that address the evolving needs of patients and societies worldwide. Their focus is on patients: They provide innovative products to treat and prevent diseases, expand access to critical medicines, ease suffering and improve quality of life. With more than 101,000 associates operating in 140 countries, Novartis is the only company with leadership positions in patented and generic pharmaceuticals, vaccines and OTC medicines.                





 Boards & Committees



Corporate Boards ▾




Secretary, Senior Vice President-Administration & General Counsel

                    Prior                  


Amgen Rockville, Inc.

                    Amgen Rockville, Inc. develops and commercializes antibody-based products. Its product development pipeline includes novel antibodies generated with its BiTE antibody platform, as well as conventional monoclonal antibodies. The company was founded in 1993 and is headquartered in Rockville, MD.                  





 Political Donations



$250

                  2008                


Barack Obama


                  Former President of United States                




$250

                  2004                


DNC Service Corp.


                  DNC Service Corp. operates a political party. It is an organization which raises fund for the Democratic Party which has been a part of the U.S. political landscape. The company plans the presidential nominating convention, promotes candidates from the local to the national level and sets the party platform. DNC Service was founded in 1848 and is located in Washington, DC.                




$250

                  2004                


John Kerry


                  Former Senator from Massachusetts                





 Public Holdings






Restricted data only for RelSci Professional users.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Transactions



 Details Hidden



                  Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Sucampo Pharma LLC purchase R-Tech Ueno, Ltd.                                     




 Details Hidden



                  Amgen, Inc. purchases Amgen Rockville, Inc.                                     





 Other Affiliations




              Matthias Alder is affiliated with
                            Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc., Cytos Biotechnology AG, Amgen Rockville, Inc., Cooley LLP, Novartis, Inc., Amgen Rockville, Inc..
            





You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤
















Alder Matthias Top Holdings  

































WhaleWisdom









Search All
Search 13F Filers Only
Search SEC Filer
Search Stocks Only
Search Mgmt Inv. Cos Only
ETFs Only
Search Active




















                      Alder Matthias
                    

•   BETHESDA, MD
                      
How do I update this listing?




                                             Alder Matthias is based out of Bethesda.    WhaleWisdom has at least 1 insider transactions (Form 3,4,5) in our database for Alder Matthias. 
                                           














Summary
13D/G
Insider (Form 4)



   Create Email Alert
 




×
Email Notification.







                   ***Log In or
                   Sign-up
                   to see more advanced email alert options such as selecting any type of
                   SEC form, multiple filers or classes of filers, and much more.***
                 

                    ...or to simply have an email sent to you whenever we receive a new
                           13F filing from Alder Matthias, enter your
                    email address below and choose 'Submit'.
                

Your email:








Cancel














Contact Info




alder matthias


C/O MICROMET, INC.

BETHESDA
MD
                                                        
                                                    28017


                                                      Business Phone:
                                                      (240) 752-1420
SEC SIC CODE:2836-BIOLOGICAL PRODUCTS, (NO DISGNOSTIC SUBSTANCES)







Recent SEC Filings




4 filed on 07/07/2017
4 filed on 05/10/2017
4 filed on 03/08/2017
4 filed on 01/06/2017
4 filed on 11/28/2016
4 filed on 10/21/2016
4 filed on 07/18/2016
4 filed on 06/16/2016
4 filed on 03/04/2016
3 filed on 11/20/2015
















Schedule 13D and 13G events since 03/31/2017

Subscription required



 
Form 4 - Non-derivative Insider Transactions Since 03/31/2017
Loading...








Elevate your investments
Try it for free





























































Matthias Alder 的个人主页 | Facebook


Facebook邮箱或手机号密码忘记帐户？中文(简体)English (US)日本語한국어Français (France)Bahasa IndonesiaPolskiEspañolPortuguês (Brasil)DeutschItalianoMessengerFacebook Lite用户地点游戏位置名人二手市场小组食谱彩色气球Instagram公司简介创建广告创建主页开发者招聘信息隐私权政策Cookie广告选项条款设置活动日志 Facebook © 2017




















Matthias S Alder - Arlington, VA | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Matthias S Alder in Arlington, VA


Matthias S Alder

                                                                           Intelius found that Matthias S Alder  is  a male between 50 and 60 years old from Arlington, VA.  We have connected them to
                8 addresses,
                8 phones,
                and 3 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Age

Matthias S Alder is in his 50s

Matthias Has Lived In

Arlington, VA
Menlo Park, CA
Miami, FL

Matthias's Relatives

Janice Alder
Marcus Alder
Marianne Alder







Matthias S Alder



Zodiac SignCapricorn



GenderMale



Professional Status
Executive Vice President Business Development & Licensing at Sucampo Pharmaceuticals , Inc.



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Matthias? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Matthias, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Matthias S Alder
Get a Criminal Check on Matthias S Alder
Get a Public Record Report on Matthias S Alder
Get a People Search Report on Matthias S Alder


Matthias S Alder's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Matthias S Alder has lived as well as Matthias S Alder's phone numbers and email addresses.




Matthias S Alder Has Lived in 5 States
Virginia Address for Matthias S Alder


4424 1*** S* N 

Arlington, VA


Has Lived In

Arlington, VA
Menlo Park, CA


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Matthias S Alder

(703) ***-**** - Arlington, VA 
(301) ***-**** - Bethesda, MD 
(240) ***-**** - Bethesda, MD 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Matthias S Alder

m****r@***.com
a*****m@***.com
m****r@***.com


Get Email Report




Matthias S Alder's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Matthias S Alder's academic history.  Find out which schools Matthias S Alder attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Matthias S Alder received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Matthias S Alder Has Attended 8 Schools
University of Miami 1989 – 1990               Matthias S Alder has a LL.M. in International and Comparative Law               
University of Miami               1989 – 1990               Matthias S Alder has a Ll.m., in International and Comparative Law               
University of Miami               1989 – 1990               Matthias S Alder has a Ll.m., International and Comparative Law in International and Comparative Law               
 1983 – 1988               Matthias S Alder has a Lic.iur. in Law               
 1983 – 1988               Matthias S Alder has a Lic.iur., Law in Law               
University of Basel               1983 – 1988               Matthias S Alder has a Lic.iur., in Law               
University of Basel               1983 – 1988               Matthias S Alder has a Lic.iur. in Law               
University of Basel               1983 – 1988               Matthias S Alder has a Lic.iur. in Law               


Matthias S Alder's Professional Information
Information regarding Matthias S Alder's professional history.  Find out previous places Matthias S Alder has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Matthias S Alder Has Worked at 12 Places
Company: Sucampo Pharmaceuticals , Inc.
               Title: Executive Vice President Business Development & Licensing
Company: Micromet , Inc.
               Title: President
Matthias S Alder's Experience
Title: Executive Vice President Business Development & Licensing
               Company: Sucampo Pharmaceuticals , Inc.
Job Details
               Company Size: $100 mil to less than $250 mil - Employee Range: 100 to less than 500
Title: President
               Company: Micromet , Inc.
Job Details
               Company Size: $10 mil to less than $25 mil - Employee Range: 100 to less than 500
Additional Professional Information on Matthias S Alder

 See Matthias S Alder's LinkedIn Profile



Matthias S Alder's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Matthias S Alder


Matthias S Alder's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Matthias S Alder's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Matthias Alder
Username Matches

                  MatthiasAlder
                  AlderMatthias
                  Matthias.Alder
                  Alder.Matthias
                  Matthias_Alder
                  Alder_Matthias
                  Matthias-Alder
                  Alder-Matthias
                  MAlder
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
M Alder







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.














SCMP Matthias A. Alder Insider Trades for Sucampo Pharmaceuticals Inc. Cl A


































Bulletin






Investor Alert







Tokyo Markets Close in:



Currencies
Europe Markets
London Markets


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Sucampo Pharmaceuticals Inc. Cl A

                  NASDAQ: SCMP
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Sucampo Pharmaceuticals Inc. Cl A



After Hours
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Jul 25, 2017, 5:09 p.m.


SCMP

/quotes/zigman/101695/composite


$
11.05




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 25,690
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/101695/composite
Today's close

$
			11.00
		


$
				11.05
			
Change

+0.05
+0.45%





Day low
Day high
$10.90
$11.10










52 week low
52 week high

            $9.30
        

            $17.55
        


















Insider Activity


Individual




Matthias A. Alder



Mr. Matthias A. Alder is Executive Vice President at Sucampo Pharmaceuticals, Inc. Mr. Alder was previously employed as Secretary & Executive VP-Corporate Development by Cytos Biotechnology AG, Secretary, SVP-Administration & General Counsel by Amgen Rockville, Inc., Partner by Cooley Godward LLP, Partner by Cooley LLP, Manager-Human Resources & Quality Assurance by Amgen Rockville, Inc., Counsel by Ciba-Geigy Corp., and Counsel by Novartis, Inc. He received his graduate degree from the University of Miami and a graduate degree from the University of Basel.



Transactions


Date
Shares
Transaction
Value





06/30/2017
673


 
Award at $8.93 per share.


6,009


03/31/2017
641


 
Award at $9.35 per share.


5,993


03/06/2017
33,000


 
Award at $0 per share.


0


12/31/2016
134


 
Award at $10.46 per share.


1,401


11/28/2016
24,975


 
Disposition at $16.73 per share.


417,832


11/28/2016
24,975


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $8.33 per share.


208,041


11/25/2016
99,025


 
Disposition at $15.88 per share.


1,572,517


11/25/2016
99,025


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $8.33 per share.


824,878


11/23/2016
26,000


 
Disposition at $15.77 per share.


410,020


11/23/2016
26,000


 
Derivative/Non-derivative trans. at $8.33 per share.


216,580


09/30/2016
639


 
Award at $9.38 per share.


5,993


06/30/2016
752


 
Award at $9.32 per share.


7,008


03/31/2016
645


 
Award at $9.29 per share.


5,992


12/31/2015
477


 
Award at $14.7 per share.


7,011


09/30/2015
413


 
Award at $14.52 per share.


5,996


06/30/2015
523


 
Award at $13.37 per share.


6,992





        Copyright 2017 FactSet Research Systems Inc. All rights reserved. Source FactSet Fundamentals.
    











            Officers and Executives
        





Mr. Peter S. Greenleaf 
Chairman & Chief Executive Officer




Mr. Peter P. Pfreundschuh 
Chief Financial Officer




Mr. Matthew Maxwell Donley 
EVP-Human Resources & Information Technology




Dr. Peter Alec Kiener 
Chief Scientific Officer




Dr. Peter  Lichtlen 
Chief Medical Officer




Mr. Matthias A. Alder 
Executive Vice President




Dr. Jones Woody Bryan 
Senior Vice President-Business Development




Mr. Gregory A. Deener 
Senior VP-Marketing Strategy & Implementation




Dr. Karen L. Smith 
Director




Mr. Paul R. Edick 
Director




Mr. Timothy P. Walbert 
Director




Dr. Robert Jay Spiegel 
Director




Dr. Daniel P. Getman 
Director




Ms. Elissa  Cote 
SVP-Global Strategic Marketing




Ms. Silvia  Taylor 
SVP-Investor Relations & Corporate Communications




Mr. Alex  Driggs 
Secretary & General Counsel




Dr. Steven  Caffé 
Senior Vice President-Regulatory Affairs




Mr. John H. Johnson 
Lead Independent Director




Ms. Maureen E. O'Connell 
Independent Director









Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


X




Powered by














Log In




10:44 PM EDT
July 25, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Closed


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Open





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:14pOne version of GOP health-care bills fails in Senate vote
9:28pGeorge Clooney and Angelina Jolie’s directorial projects could be the most sought-after tickets at TIFF
8:41pJohn McCain gives Trump a win, then gives Senate an earful
8:20pPayPal earnings: Partnerships help, but are benefits already priced in?
7:47pAMD puts Intel in the crosshairs with fast-and-cheap Threadripper chip
7:40pAMD earnings give investors what they wanted, now it must deliver
7:29pHow about never? Avoid taking meetings with these troublesome co-workers 
7:23pHouse passes bill hitting Russia with new sanctions
7:04pWSJ Interview: Trump Doesn't Rule Out Firing Sessions
7:01pFormer Trump campaign chief Manafort strikes deal to avoid public testimony
6:46pOne depressing reason millions of people are locked out of the American Dream
6:45pHouse votes to prevent disgruntled customers from being able to sue their bank
6:04pThis quant pro and card counter says gambling can make you a better investor
6:01pBitcoin, digital currencies retreat from records
5:43pThis is what it will take for bitcoin to become a legit currency 
5:37pEmerging markets fund manager favors Bangladesh and Kenya, and avoids Korea and Taiwan
5:35pUSS Thunderbolt Fires Warning Shots at Iranian Vessel in Gulf
5:32pHere’s one Trump fan who might make you some money
5:30pChegg shares sink after second-quarter loss 
5:24pMcCain Returns to Senate With Strong Comments on Health Care
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,613.43

+100.26
+0.47%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,412.17

+1.37
+0.02%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,477.13

+7.22
+0.29%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15

























































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft






















Loading Your Search Results - PeopleLooker.com























Updating Data On {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{nameize mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}} {{#validLocation city}}in {{city}}{{#validLocation state}},{{/validLocation}} {{/validLocation}}{{#validLocation state}}{{#unless city}}in {{/unless}}{{uppercase state}}{{/validLocation}}
Important! PeopleLooker uses real public records. The information may be surprising.












Less than 30 seconds remaining


Continue to Results 







Now
We look up all people named {{nameize fn}} {{nameize ln}}.




Next
You pick which one you're looking for.




Then
We search our database for info on them.




Hooray!
You get your report!












Where does {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{uppercase mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}}
live?
Please help us narrow down your search











All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





I'm not sure














Please enter a full name
Please help us narrow down your search







First Name:

Please Enter First Name


Last Name:

Please Enter Last Name












































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





































People Searching Made Easy! | PeopleLooker
































Looking to Find Out About Someone?

Find information you may not get on Google.












State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming





Search





We respect your privacy.













We've run over


1,000,000


background reports!
Successful background reports!









Access Premium Public Records

Quickly search public records that could otherwise take you weeks or months
to collect. Find friends, relatives, neighbors, or even yourself. Comprehensive
people search reports may contain:




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records




Relatives
Email Addresses
Much More!




Names
Criminal Records
Date of Birth
Relatives
Email Addresses




Phone Numbers
Addresses
Court Records
Much More!







The New Way to Find People
More than a regular search engine.

It's the quick and easy way to look people up. Do a deep public record
search to uncover the important information you're looking for. Now you'll
never have to search someone on google again.





















